Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Licensing of Operators of Motor Vehicles for Hire

§ 21-27-131.
Obtaining permit; appeal from refusal to grant permit.

No person may drive or operate motor vehicles for hire in any city or town in this state unless he shall first have been licensed so to do as follows: he shall make application to the mayor of such municipality in writing, accompanied by a statement of some reputable citizen thereof, that the applicant is over the age of eighteen (18) years, an experienced driver, of good moral character, and physically and mentally capacitated to drive and operate such motor vehicle. The mayor shall place such application before the board of aldermen, or other governing authorities, whereupon inquiry may be made by such governing authorities into the moral character and mental and physical fitness of the applicant. If the permit shall be granted the applicant shall receive a certificate of such permit, signed by the mayor, together with an identification badge, and the name of the municipality thereon, and which shall be worn so that the same will be displayed while engaged in or about such occupation. The governing authorities of the municipality may require the applicant to give a reasonable bond, of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), to guarantee the faithful observance of the law as well as the rules and regulations which may be prescribed by the said municipality, and they may also require a reasonable fee, for such permit and badge. In the event the governing authority of such municipality refuse to grant such permit to an applicant, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court, in the manner provided by law for appealing from other orders of the governing authorities of municipalities, and the questions to be tried upon appeal will be as to the age and experience and the moral, mental and physical fitness of the said applicant to pursue such vocation in such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5596; 1942, § 3495; Laws, 1922, ch. 217; Laws, 1994, ch. 459, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 21-27-133.
Owner or operator of motor vehicle for hire must carry liability insurance or bond; actions thereon.

No certificate or permit shall be issued by any municipality to the owner or operator of any motor vehicle owned or operated for hire in any city or town in this state, unless and until such owner or operator shall have filed with, and the same has been approved by, the governing authorities of the municipality, an insurance policy, or certificates of insurance in lieu thereof, issued by some insurance company authorized to transact business in this state, or bond or bonds, to be approved by the said governing authorities of the municipality, in an amount required by an ordinance of said municipality, conditioned to pay any final judgment against said owner or operator for personal injuries or property damages resulting from or arising out of the use, maintenance, or operation of the said motor vehicle. The amount of the insurance policy or bond required under this section on any motor vehicle of any such owner or operator shall in no case be less than ten thousand dollars for the death or injury to any one person, and subject to said limit for one person, twenty thousand dollars total public liability for any one accident and ten thousand dollars for property damage.

The insurance policy or bond, filed with the municipality as required by this section, shall contain a provision or indorsement to the effect that the same shall not be cancelled for any cause by either party thereto unless and until ten days’ written notice thereof shall have been given to the said municipality.

In any action, whether in law or in equity, against any owner or operator, operating under the provisions of this section, the insurer, insurance company, or obligor in the policy of insurance or bond given by such owner or operator in compliance with this section, shall not be joined as a party to such suit and shall not be a proper party thereto, except as hereinafter provided.

The insurer, insurance company, or obligor, in any policy of insurance or bond filed in compliance with this section, shall be obligated to pay any final judgment obtained against such owner or operator as herein provided, regardless of the solvency, insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership, of such owner or operator. In the event that the insured shall abandon his permit and leave the state, a claimant asserting his claim within the provisions of said insurance policy or bond may file suit against the insurer or insurance company or obligor issuing such insurance policy or executing such bond in a court of competent jurisdiction without the necessity of making the insured a party to said suit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3495.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 506, §§ 1-5, eff July 1, 1958.

§ 21-27-135.
Transfer of badge unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any driver who secures such permit and badge to transfer such badge to any other driver, or for any person to use the badge of another person while driving or operating a motor vehicle for hire.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5597; 1942, § 3496; Laws, 1922, ch. 217.

§ 21-27-137.
Revocation or suspension of permit.

The governing authority of the municipality may revoke or suspend such permit and demand the return of such badge upon proof that the holder while driving, or while in charge of such motor vehicle:

was intoxicated, or noticeably under the influence of intoxicating liquor; or,

had disturbed the peace while so engaged; or,

had recklessly disregarded the speed regulations prescribed by law; or,

had been guilty of knowingly transporting intoxicating liquor; or,

had carried concealed weapons in violation of law; or,

had knowingly transported persons for the purpose of gaming or prostitution, or for the purpose of obtaining intoxicating liquor.

The said authority may by ordinance prescribe other reasonable rules and regulations governing the use and operation of motor vehicles for hire within the municipality, and cause the same to be observed by such driver or operator, under penalty of revocation or suspension of such permit. Any person whose permit to drive or operate a motor vehicle for hire has been suspended or revoked may appeal to the circuit court from such order in the manner provided for appeals from orders of the governing authority of municipalities, but such appeal shall not operate as a supersedeas of said order.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5598; 1942, § 3497; Laws, 1922, ch. 217.

§ 21-27-139.
Vehicle to be registered and numbered.

The owner of any motor vehicle operated for hire in any city or town in this state, shall before causing the same to be operated, register the said vehicle with the clerk of such municipality, in the name of the owner, with the number of motor, and number of license tag for that year. The clerk shall keep said registration in a book kept for that purpose and give a number to such vehicle, which the owner shall cause to be painted or stenciled on two sides of the said vehicle. Such number shall not be required to be changed at subsequent registrations.

Such vehicle shall be reregistered on or before the first day of February each year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5599; 1942, § 3498; Laws, 1922, ch. 217.

§ 21-27-141.
Penalty for violations.

Any person or persons who may violate any of the provisions of Sections 21-27-131, 21-27-135, 21-27-137, or 21-27-139, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction shall be fined not more than $50.00 or thirty days in jail, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Failure of any owner or operator to comply with any of the requirements of Section 21-27-133 shall be cause for the revocation or suspension of his permit, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5601; 1942, §§ 3495.5, 3500; Laws, 1922, ch. 217; Laws, 1958, ch. 506, §§ 1-5, eff July 1, 1958.